Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.1, as
last amended by Section 14, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 60.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 60.1. As used in the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act
and in the Domestic Abuse Reporting Act, Sections 40.5 through 40.7
of this title, and Section 150.12B of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes:
1. “Coercive control” means unreasonably engaging in any of the
following:
a. intentionally preventing contact of a family or
household member from friends, relatives, or other
sources of support,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. depriving a family or household member of basic
necessities,
c. controlling, regulating, or monitoring a family or
household member’s movements, communications, daily
behavior, finances, economic resources, or access to
services, which includes stalking or cyberstalking,
d. compelling a family or household member by force,
threat, or intimidation including, but not limited to,
malicious threats of legal prosecution for conduct
that is permitted by law,
e. committing or threatening to commit cruelty to an
animal that intimidates a family or household member,
f. forced sex acts or threats of a sexual nature
including, but not limited to, threatened acts of
sexual conduct or threats to release sexual images,
g. making demands on a family or household member which
limit free will and lead to compliance, or
h. willfully aiding an intimate partner or family member
in suicide or attempting suicide as described in
Sections 813 through 815 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
2. “Dating relationship” means intimate association, primarily
characterized by affectionate or sexual involvement. For purposes
of this act section and Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Stat utes, a casual acquaintance or ordinary fraternization between
persons in a business or social context shall not constitute a
dating relationship;
2. 3. “Domestic abuse” means any act of physical harm or the
threat of imminent physical harm which is committed by an adult,
emancipated minor, or minor child thirteen (13) years of age or
older against another adult, emancipated minor or minor child who is
currently or was previously an intimate partner or family or
household member;
3. 4. “Family or household members” means:
a. parents, including grandparents, stepparents, adoptive
parents and foster parents,
b. children, including grandchildren, stepchildren,
adopted children and foster children,
c. persons otherwise related by blood or marriage living
in the same household,
d. persons otherwise related by blood or marriage, or
e. persons not related by blood or marriage living in the
same household;
4. 5. “Foreign protective order” means any valid order of
protection issued by a court of another state or a tribal court;
5. 6. “Harassment” means a knowing and willful course or
pattern of conduct by a family or household member or an individual
who is or has been involved in a dating relationship with the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pers on, directed at a specific person which seriously alarms or
annoys the person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The
course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to
suffer substantial emotional distress and must actually cause
substantial distress to the person. “Harassment” Harrassment shall
include, but not be limited to, harassing or obscene telephone calls
in violation of Section 1172 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
and fear of death or bodily injury;
6. 7. “Intimate partner” means:
a. current or former spouses,
b. persons who are or were in a dating relationship,
c. persons who are the biological parents of the same
child, regardless of their marital status or whether
they have lived together at any time, and
d. persons who currently or formerly lived together in an
intimate way, primarily characterized by affectionate
or sexual involvement. A sexual relationship may be
an indicator that a person is an intimate partner, but
is never a necessary condition;
7. 8. “Living in the same household” means:
a. persons who regularly reside in the same single-
dwelling unit,
b. persons who resided in the same single-dwelling unit
within the past year, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. persons who have individual lease agreements whereby
each person has his or her own private bedroom and
shares the common areas;
8. 9. “Mutual protective order” means a final protective order
or orders issued to both a plaintiff who has filed a petition for a
protective order and a defendant included as the defendant in the
plaintiff’s petition restraining the parties from committing
domestic violence, stalking, harassment or rape against each other.
If both parties allege domestic abuse, violence, stalking,
harassment or rape against each other, the parties shall do so by
separate petition pursuant to Section 60.4 of this title;
9. 10. “Rape” means rape and rape by instrumentation in
violation of Sections 1111 and 1111.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
10. 11. “Stalking” means the willful, malicious, and repeated
following or harassment of a person by an adult, emancipated minor,
or minor thirteen (13) years of age or older, in a manner that would
cause a reasonable person to feel frightened, intimidated,
threatened, harassed, or molested and actually causes the person
being followed or harassed to feel terrorized, frightened,
intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested. Stalking also means
a course of conduct composed of a series of two or more separate
acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a continuity
of purpose or unconsented contact with a person that is initiated or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cont inued without the consent of the individual or in disregard of
the expressed desire of the individual that the contact be avoided
or discontinued. Unconsented contact or course of conduct includes,
but is not limited to:
a. maintaining a visual or physical proximity to the
individual,
b. approaching or confronting that individual in a public
place or on private property,
c. appearing at the workplace of the individual or
contacting the employer or coworkers of the
individual,
d. appearing at the residence of the individual or
contacting the neighbors of the individual,
e. entering onto or remaining on property owned, leased
or occupied by the individual,
f. contacting the individual by telephone, text message,
electronic message, electronic mail, or other means of
electronic communication or causing the telephone or
electronic device of the individual or the telephone
or electronic device of any other person to ring or
generate notifications repeatedly or continuously,
regardless of whether a conversation ensues,
g. photographing, videotaping, audiotaping, or, through
any other electronic means, monitoring or recording
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the activities of the individual. This subparagraph
applies regardless of where the act occurs,
h. sending any physical or electronic material or
contacting the individual by any means, including any
message, comment, or other content posted on any
Internet site or web application,
i. sending to a family member or member of the household
of the individual, or any current or former employer
of the individual, or any current or former coworker
of the individual, or any friend of the individual,
any physical or electronic material or contacting such
person by any means, including any message, comment,
or other content posted on any Internet site or web
application, for the purpose of obtaining information
about, disseminating information about, or
communicating with the individual,
j. placing an object on, or delivering an object to,
property owned, leased or occupied by the individual,
k. delivering an object to a family member or member of
the household of the individual, or an employer,
coworker, or friend of the individual, or placing an
object on, or delivering an object to, property owned,
leased, or occupied by such a person with the intent
that the object be delivered to the individual, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

l. causing a person to engage in any of the acts
described in subparagraphs a through k of this
paragraph; and
11. 12. “Victim support person” means a person affiliated with
a domestic violence, sexual assault or adult human sex trafficking
program, certified by the Attorney General or operating under a
tribal government, who provides support and assistance for a person
who files a petition under the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED














SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1728 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)